California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 19.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Repealed as of December 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17215.

(a) Section 220(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deduction allowed, is modified to provide that the amount allowed as a deduction shall be an amount equal to the amount allowed to that individual as a deduction under Section 220 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to medical savings accounts, on the federal income tax return filed for the same taxable year by that individual.

(b) Section 220(f)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to additional tax on distributions not used for qualified medical expenses, is modified by substituting “12.5 percent” in lieu of “20 percent.”

(c) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to disbursements made during taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 12.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

17215.1.

Section 220(f)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rollover contributions, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 26.5.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17215.4.

Section 223 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to health savings accounts, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 26.6.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17220.

(a) Section 164(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the deductibility of state, local, and foreign income, war profits, and excess profits taxes, shall not apply.

(b) Section 164(b)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to general sales taxes, shall not apply.

(c) Section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the limitation on individual deductions for taxable years 2018 to 2025, shall not apply. 

(d) In addition to the provisions of Section 164(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deduction denied in case of certain taxes,
 no deduction shall be allowed for any tax imposed under Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 17935), Chapter 10.6 (commencing with Section 17941), or Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 17948) of this part or under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 33.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17222.

No deduction shall be allowed for the tax deducted and withheld under Section 18662 and Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code either to the employer or to the recipient of the income in computing taxable income under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 8.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

17224.

Section 163(e) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified as follows:

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1987, and before the taxable year in which the debt obligation matures or is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed, the amount deductible under this part is the same as the amount deductible on the federal tax return.

(b) The difference between the amount deductible on the federal tax return and the amount allowable under this part,
 with respect to obligations issued after December 31, 1984, for taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, shall be allowed as a deduction in the taxable year in which the debt obligation matures or is sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed.

(c) The provisions of Section 7202(c) of Public Law 101-239, relating to the effective date for treatment of certain high yield original issue discount obligations, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 452, Sec. 9.   Effective July 31, 1990.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1990, by Sec. 56 of Ch. 452.)
-------------------------------------------

17225.

(a) Section 163(h)(3)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to mortgage insurance premiums treated as interest, shall not apply.

(b) Section 163(h)(3)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for taxable years 2018 to 2025, shall not apply.

(c) Section 163(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on business interest, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 10.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17228.

For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a deduction shall not be allowed for the amount of any fine or penalty paid or incurred by an owner of all or part of a professional sports franchise, where that fine or penalty is assessed or imposed by the professional sports league that includes that franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 792, Sec. 1.   (AB 877)   Effective September 29, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

17230.

Payments made to the California Housing Finance Agency by the borrower pursuant to Section 52514 of the Health and Safety Code shall be considered payments of interest for purposes of Section 163 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 29.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17240.

The fee imposed by Section 9008 of the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), shall be considered a tax described in Section 275(a)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 359, Sec. 13.   (AB 154)   Effective September 30, 2015.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

17241.

Section 213(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to allowance of deduction, is modified by substituting “7.5 percent” for “10 percent” for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 35.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, as provided in Sec. 41 of Stats. 2015, Ch. 359.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.

(a) Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to accelerated cost recovery system, is modified as follows:

(1) Any reference to “tax imposed by this chapter” in Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to accelerated cost recovery system, means “net tax,” as defined in Section 17039.

(2) Section 168(b)(3)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(3) (A) Section 168(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to classification of certain property, is modified to provide that any grapevine, replaced in a
 vineyard in California in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1992, as a direct result of a phylloxera infestation in that vineyard, or replaced in a vineyard in California in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, as a direct result of Pierce’s disease in that vineyard, shall be “five-year property,” rather than “10-year property.”

(B) Section 168(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for determining class life, is modified to provide that any grapevine, replaced in a vineyard in California in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1992, as a direct result of a phylloxera infestation in that vineyard, or replaced in a vineyard in California in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1997, as a direct result of Pierce’s disease in that vineyard, shall have a class
 life of 10 years. 

(C) Every taxpayer claiming a depreciation deduction with respect to grapevines as described in this paragraph shall obtain a written certification from an independent state-certified integrated pest management adviser, or a state agricultural commissioner or adviser, that specifies that the replanting was necessary to restore a vineyard infested with phylloxera or Pierce’s disease. The taxpayer shall retain the certification for future audit purposes.

(4) Section 168(e)(3)(B)(vii) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(5) Section 168(e)(3)(B)(viii) of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not apply.

(6) Section 168(e)(3)(E)(vii)
 of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(7) Section 168(e)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified improvement property, shall not apply.

(8) Section 168(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to alternative depreciation system for certain property, is modified as follows:

(A) Section 168(g)(1)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(B) Section 168(g)(1)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(C) The amendments made by Section 13204(a) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Sections 168(g)(2)(C) and 168(g)(3)(B) of the Internal
 Revenue Code shall not apply.

(D) Section 168(g)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to electing real property trade or business, shall not apply.

(9) Section 168(i)(15)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to termination, is modified by substituting the phrase “December 31, 2007” for the phrase “December 31, 2025.”

(10) Section 168(j) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to property on Indian reservations, shall not apply.

(11) Section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special allowance for certain property, shall not apply.

(12) Section 168(l) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating
 to qualified second-generation biofuel plant property, shall not apply.

(13) Section 168(m) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special allowance for certain reuse and recycling property, shall not apply.

(b) Section 169 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amortization of pollution control facilities, is modified as follows:

(1) The deduction allowed by Section 169 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be allowed only with respect to facilities located in this state.

(2) The “state certifying authority,” as defined in Section 169(d)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, means the State Air Resources Board, in the case of air pollution, and the State
 Water Resources Control Board, in the case of water pollution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 12.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.1.

(a) Section 170(b)(1)(A)(ix) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to percentage limitations, shall not apply.

(b) Section 170(b)(1)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increased limitation for cash contributions, shall not apply. 

(c) Section 170(b)(1)(E)(vi) of the Internal Revenue Code as it read on January 1, 2015, relating to termination, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 37.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.2.

Section 170(p) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for taxpayers who do not elect to itemize deductions, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 38.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17250.5.

(a) Section 167(g) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to depreciation under income forecast method, shall be modified as follows:

(1) Section 167(g)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified by substituting “Section 19521” for “Section 460(b)(7)” of the Internal Revenue Code.

(2) Section 167(g)(5)(D) of the Internal
 Revenue Code is modified by substituting “Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) (other than Section 19136)” for “Subtitle F (other than Sections 6654 and 6655).”

(3) Section 167(g)(5)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of distribution costs, shall not apply.

(4) Section 167(g)(7) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to treatment of participations and residuals, shall not apply.

(b) Section 167(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amortization of geological and geophysical expenditures, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 20.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17255.

(a) Section 179(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to dollar limitation, shall not apply and in lieu thereof, the aggregate cost which may be taken into account under Section 179(a) of the Internal Revenue Code for any taxable year shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(b) Section 179(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to reduction in limitation, does not apply and in lieu thereof, the limitation under subdivision (a) for any taxable year shall be reduced, but not to below zero, by the amount by which the cost of Section 179 property, as defined in Section 179(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, except as otherwise provided, placed in service
 during the taxable year exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(c) Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to provide that the “aggregate amount disallowed” referred to in Section 179(b)(3)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code shall be computed under this part as it read on the date the property generating the amount disallowed was placed in service.

(d) Section 179(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to elections, shall not apply.

(e) Section 179(d)(1)(A)(ii) of the Internal Revenue Code does not apply.

(f) Section 179(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for qualified disaster assistance property, shall not apply.

(g) The amendments made by Section 124 of the Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2016 (Public Law 114-113) to Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to elections to expense certain depreciable business assets, shall not apply.

(h) The amendments made by Section 13101 of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to elections to expense certain depreciable business assets, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 39.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17256.

Section 179A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deduction for clean-fuel vehicles and certain refueling property, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 32.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17257.

Section 179C of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election to expense certain refineries, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 22.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17257.2.

Section 179D of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to energy efficient commercial buildings deduction, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 23.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17257.4.

Section 179E of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to election to expense advanced mine safety equipment, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 24.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17260.

(a) No deduction, other than depreciation, shall be allowed for expenditures for tertiary injectants as provided by Section 193 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to tertiary injectants. 

(b) Section 263(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to intangible drilling and development costs in the case of oil and gas wells and geothermal wells, shall not apply to intangible drilling and development costs, in the case of oil and gas wells, paid or incurred on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 236, Sec. 13.   (SB 1435)   Effective September 14, 2026.   Applicable to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, provided in Section 46\nof Stats. 2026, Ch. 236.)
-------------------------------------------

17269.

Whereas, the people of the State of California desire to promote and achieve tax equity and fairness among all the state’s citizens and further desire to conform to the public policy of nondiscrimination, the Legislature hereby enacts the following for these reasons and for no other purpose:

(a) The provisions of Section 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not be applicable to expenses incurred by a taxpayer
 with respect to expenditures made at, or payments made to, a club which restricts membership or the use of its services or facilities on the basis of ancestry or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code, except for genetic information.

(b) A club described in subdivision (a) holding an alcoholic beverage license pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code, except a club holding an alcoholic beverage license pursuant to Section 23425 thereof, shall provide on each receipt furnished to a taxpayer a printed statement as follows:

“The expenditures covered by this receipt are nondeductible for state income tax purposes or franchise tax purposes.”

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Expenses”
 means those expenses otherwise deductible under Section 162(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, except for subdivision (a), and includes, but is not limited to, club membership dues and assessments, food and beverage expenses, expenses for services furnished by the club, and reimbursements or salary adjustments to officers or employees for any of the preceding expenses.

(2) “Club” means a club as defined in Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) of the Business and Professions Code, except a club as defined in Section 23425 thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 261, Sec. 22.   (SB 559)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

17270.

(a) For purposes of Section 162(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to travel expenses, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The place of residence of a member of the Legislature within the district represented shall be considered the tax home.

(2) The provisions of Section 162(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to state legislators’ travel expenses away from home, shall not be applied.

(b) The provisions of Section 280C(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (relating to rule for employment credits) shall not apply.

(c) The amendments made by Section 13206(d)(2)(A) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) to Section 280C(c) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit for increasing research activities, shall not apply, except as otherwise provided. 

(d) Section 280C(c)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, as enacted pursuant to Section 13206(d)(2)(A) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), is modified to refer to Section 17041 in lieu of Section 11(b) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 40.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17271.

(a) The amendments made to Section 162(m) of the Internal Revenue Code by Section 13601(e)(2) of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97), relating to exception for binding contracts, shall apply, and is modified by substituting “March 31, 2019” for “November 2, 2017.”

(b) Section 162(m)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to covered employee, shall not apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 41.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17273.

For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1999, Section 162(l)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to applicable percentage, is modified to provide that Section 2002 of the Tax and Trade Relief Extension Act of 1998 (P.L. 105-277), relating to phase in of a 100-percent deduction for health insurance, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 146, Sec. 23.5.   Effective July 22, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17274.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions in this part to the contrary, no deduction shall be allowed for interest, taxes, depreciation, or amortization paid or incurred in the taxable year with respect to substandard housing located in this state, except as provided in subdivision (e).

(b) “Substandard housing” means occupied dwellings from which the taxpayer derives rental income or unoccupied or abandoned dwellings for which both of the following apply:

(1) Either of the following occurs:

(A) For occupied dwellings from which the taxpayer derives rental income, a state or local government regulatory agency has determined that the housing violates state law or local codes dealing with health, safety, or building.

(B) For dwellings that are unoccupied or abandoned for at least 90 days, a state or local government regulatory agency has cited the housing for conditions that constitute a serious violation of state law or local codes dealing with health, safety, or building, and that constitute a threat to public health and safety.

(2) Either of the following occurs:

(A) After written notice of violation by the regulatory agency, specifying the
 applicability of this section, the housing has not been brought to a condition of compliance within six months after the date of the notice or the time prescribed in the notice, whichever period is later.

(B) Good faith efforts for compliance have not been commenced, as determined by the regulatory agency.

“Substandard housing” also means employee housing that has not, within 30 days of the date of the written notice of violation or the date for compliance prescribed in the written notice of violation, been brought into compliance with the conditions stated in the written notice of violation of the Employee Housing Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Division 13 of the Health and Safety Code) issued by the enforcement agency that specifies the application of this section. The regulatory agency may, for good cause shown, extend the compliance date prescribed in a violation notice.

(c) (1) When the period specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) has expired without compliance, the regulatory agency shall mail to the taxpayer a notice of noncompliance. The notice of noncompliance shall be in a form and shall include information prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, shall be mailed by certified mail to the taxpayer at the taxpayer’s last known address, and shall advise the taxpayer of (A) an intent to notify the Franchise Tax Board of the noncompliance within 10 days unless an appeal is filed, (B) where an appeal may be filed, and (C) a general description of the tax consequences of the filing with the Franchise Tax Board. Appeals shall be made to the same body and in the same manner as appeals from other actions of the regulatory agency. If no appeal is made within 10 days or if after disposition of the appeal the regulatory agency is sustained, the regulatory agency shall notify, in writing, the
 Franchise Tax Board of the noncompliance.

(2) The notice of noncompliance shall contain the legal description or the lot and block numbers of the real property, the assessor’s parcel number, and the name of the owner of record as shown on the latest equalized assessment roll. In addition, the regulatory agency shall, at the same time as notification of the notice of noncompliance is sent to the Franchise Tax Board, record a copy of the notice of noncompliance in the office of the recorder for the county in which the substandard housing is located that includes a statement of tax consequences that may be determined by the Franchise Tax Board. However, the failure to record a notice with the county recorder does not relieve the liability of any taxpayer nor does it create any liability on the part of the regulatory agency.

(3) The regulatory agency may charge the taxpayer a fee in
 an amount not to exceed the regulatory agency’s costs incurred in recording any notice of noncompliance or issuing any release of that notice. The notice of compliance shall be recorded and shall serve to expunge the notice of noncompliance. The notice of compliance shall contain the same recording information required for the notice of noncompliance. No deduction by the taxpayer, or any other taxpayer who obtains title to the property subsequent to the recordation of the notice of noncompliance, shall be allowed for the items provided in subdivision (a) from the date of the notice of noncompliance until the date the regulatory agency determines that the substandard housing has been brought to a condition of compliance. The regulatory agency shall mail to the Franchise Tax Board and the taxpayer a notice of compliance, which notice shall be in the form and include the information prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. In the event the period of noncompliance does not cover an entire taxable year, the
 deductions shall be denied at the rate of 112 for each full month during the period of noncompliance.

(4) If the property is owned by more than one owner or if the recorded title is in the name of a fictitious owner, the notice requirements provided in subdivision (b) and this subdivision shall be satisfied for each owner if the notices are mailed to one owner or to the fictitious name owner at the address appearing on the latest available property tax bill. However, notices made pursuant to this subdivision do not relieve the regulatory agency from furnishing taxpayer identification information required to implement this section to the Franchise Tax Board.

(d) For the purposes of this section, a notice of noncompliance shall not be mailed by the regulatory agency to the Franchise
 Tax Board if any of the following occur:

(1) The housing was rendered substandard solely by reason of earthquake, flood, or other natural disaster except where the condition remains for more than three years after the disaster.

(2) The owner of the substandard housing has secured financing to bring the housing into compliance with those laws or codes that have been violated, causing the housing to be classified as substandard, and has commenced repairs or other work necessary to bring the housing into compliance.

(3) The owner of substandard housing that is not within the meaning of housing accommodation as defined by subdivision (d) of Section 35805 of the Health and Safety Code has done both of the following:

(A) Attempted to secure financing to bring
 the housing into compliance with those laws or codes that have been violated, causing the housing to be classified as substandard.

(B) Been denied that financing solely because the housing is located in a neighborhood or geographical area in which financial institutions do not provide financing for rehabilitation of any of that type of housing.

(e) This section does not apply to deductions from income derived from property rendered substandard solely by reason of a change in applicable state or local housing standards unless the violations cause substantial danger to the occupants of the property, as determined by the regulatory agency which has served notice of violation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(f) The owner of substandard housing found to be in noncompliance shall, upon total or partial divestiture of interest
 in the property, immediately notify the regulatory agency of the name and address of the person or persons to whom the property has been sold or otherwise transferred and the date of the sale or transference.

(g) By July 1 of each year, the regulatory agency shall report to the appropriate legislative body of its jurisdiction all of the following information, for the preceding calendar year, regarding its activities to secure code enforcement, which shall be public information:

(1) The number of written notices of violation issued for substandard housing under subdivision (b).

(2) The number of violations complied with within the period prescribed in subdivision (b).

(3) The number of notices of noncompliance issued pursuant to subdivision (c).

(4) The number of appeals from those notices pursuant to subdivision (c).

(5) The number of successful appeals by owners.

(6) The number of notices of noncompliance mailed to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (c).

(7) The number of cases in which a notice of noncompliance was not sent pursuant to subdivision (d).

(8) The number of extensions for compliance granted pursuant to subdivision (b) and the mean average length of the extensions.

(9) The mean average length of time from the issuance of a notice of violation to the mailing of a notice of noncompliance to the Franchise Tax Board where the notice is actually
 sent to the Franchise Tax Board.

(10) The number of cases where compliance is achieved after a notice of noncompliance has been mailed to the Franchise Tax Board.

(11) The number of instances of disallowance of tax deductions by the Franchise Tax Board resulting from referrals made by the regulatory agency. This information may be filed in a supplemental report in succeeding years as it becomes available.

(h) The provisions of this section relating to substandard housing consisting of abandoned or unoccupied dwellings do not apply to any lender engaging in a “federally related transaction,” as defined in Section 11302 of the Business and Professions Code, who acquires title through judicial or nonjudicial foreclosure, or accepts a deed in lieu of foreclosure. The exception provided in this subdivision covers only
 substandard housing consisting of abandoned or unoccupied dwellings involved in the federally related transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 31.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17275.

In computing taxable income, no deduction shall be allowed for any of the following:

(a) Abandonment fees paid under Section 51061 or 51093 of the Government Code. 

(b) Tax recoupment fees paid under Section 51142 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 29.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17275.2.

Section 170(e)(3)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule for contributions of food inventory, shall not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 25.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

17275.4.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2014, a deduction for a charitable contribution to an educational organization that is a postsecondary institution or to the Key Worldwide Foundation, pursuant to Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to charitable, etc., contributions and gifts, and a deduction for a business expense related to a payment to the Edge College and Career Network, LLC, pursuant to Section 162 of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to trade or business expenses, shall not be allowed to a taxpayer who meets all of the following conditions:

(1) They are charged as a defendant in any of the following criminal complaints filed in the United States District Court for the District of Massachusetts:

(A) Criminal Complaint #19-CR-10081-IT.

(B) Criminal Complaint #19-CR-10078-RWZ.

(C) Criminal Complaint #19-CR-10075-MLW.

(D) Criminal Complaint #19-CR-10074-NMG.

(E) Criminal Complaint #19-cr-10079-RWZ.

(F) Criminal Complaint #1:19-cr-10117.

(G) Criminal Complaint #1:19-cr-10115.

(H) Criminal Complaint #19-cr-10131.

(I) Criminal Complaint #1:19-cr-10116.

(J) Criminal Complaint #1-19-cr-10080.

(2) There is a final determination of their guilt with regard to a violation of any offense of Title 18 of the United States Code arising out of that criminal complaint.

(3) There is a finding that they took the deduction unlawfully pursuant to the final determination of guilt described in paragraph (2), or pursuant to a determination by the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) For purposes of this section, “final determination
 of guilt” means that the defendant has been convicted by verdict of a jury, accepted and recorded by the court, by a finding of the court in a case where a jury has been waived, or by a plea of guilty, and that the defendant has exhausted all appellate remedies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 511, Sec. 2.   (AB 136)   Effective October 4, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

17275.5.

(a) No deduction shall be denied under Section 170(f)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to substantiation requirement for certain contributions, upon a showing that the requirements in Section 170(f)(8) of the Internal Revenue Code have been met with respect to that contribution for federal purposes.

(b) Section 170(f)(10)(F) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to excise tax on premiums paid, shall not apply.

(c) The provisions of Section 170(f)(11)(E) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified appraisal and appraiser, shall apply to appraisals prepared with respect to returns or submissions filed on or after January 1, 2010.

(d) Section 170(f)(13) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contributions of certain interests in buildings located in registered historic districts, shall not apply.

(e) Section 170(f)(18) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to contributions to donor advised funds, shall not apply.

(f) For contributions made on or after January 1, 2024, the amendments made by Section 605(b) of Public Law 117-328 adding paragraph (19) to Section 170(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to certain qualified conservation contributions, shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 21.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17275.6.

(a) For contributions made on or after January 1, 2024, the amendments made by Section 605(a)(1) of Public Law 117-328 adding paragraph (7) to Section 170(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on deduction for qualified conservation contributions made by passthrough entities, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) Section 170(h)(7)(G) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to regulations, as added by Section 605(a)(1) of Public Law 117-328, shall not apply.

(c) For contributions made on or after January 1, 2024, the amendments made by Section 605(a)(3) of Public Law 117-328, relating to extension of statute of limitations for listed transactions, shall
 apply and are modified by substituting “Section 19755” for “sections 6501(c)(10) and 6235(c)(6) of such Code.”

(d) Section 605(d)(2) of Public Law 117-328, relating to opportunity to correct, shall apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 22.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

17276.

Except as provided in Sections 17276.2, 17276.5, and 17276.6, as those sections read on November 30, 2014, and Sections 17276.1, 17276.4, and 17276.7, the deduction provided by Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to net operating loss deduction, shall be modified as follows:

(a) (1) Net operating losses attributable to taxable years beginning before January 1, 1987, shall not be allowed.

(2) A net operating loss shall not be carried forward to any taxable year beginning before January 1, 1987.

(3) The amendments made by Section 13302(a)(1) of the Tax Cuts
 and Jobs Act, 2017 (Public Law 115-97) and Section 2303(a)(1) of the Coronavirus Aid, Relief, and Economic Security Act (Public Law 116-136) to Section 172(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the deduction allowed, shall not apply.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) and (4), the provisions of Section 172(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amount of carrybacks and carryovers, shall be modified so that the applicable percentage of the entire amount of the net operating loss for any taxable year shall be eligible for carryover to any subsequent taxable year. For purposes of this subdivision, the applicable percentage shall be:

(A) Fifty percent for any taxable year beginning before January 1, 2000.

(B) Fifty-five percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2000, and before January 1, 2002.

(C) Sixty percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004.

(D) One hundred percent for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2004.

(2) Section 172(b)(2)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(3) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates a new business during that taxable year, each of the following shall apply to each loss incurred
 during the first three taxable years of operating the new business:

(A) If the net operating loss is equal to or less than the net loss from the new business, 100 percent of the net operating loss shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (d).

(B) If the net operating loss is greater than the net loss from the new business, the net operating loss shall be carried over as follows:

(i) With respect to an amount equal to the net loss from the new business, 100 percent of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (d).

(ii) With respect to the portion of the net operating loss that exceeds the net loss from the new business, the
 applicable percentage of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (d).

(C) For purposes of Section 172(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to amount of carrybacks and carryovers, the amount described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall be absorbed before the amount described in clause (i) of subparagraph (B).

(4) In the case of a taxpayer who has a net operating loss in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, and who operates an eligible small business during that taxable year, each of the following shall apply:

(A) If the net operating loss is equal to or less than the net loss from the eligible small business, 100 percent of the net operating loss shall be
 carried forward to the taxable years specified in subdivision (d).

(B) If the net operating loss is greater than the net loss from the eligible small business, the net operating loss shall be carried over as follows:

(i) With respect to an amount equal to the net loss from the eligible small business, 100 percent of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (d).

(ii) With respect to that portion of the net operating loss that exceeds the net loss from the eligible small business, the applicable percentage of that amount shall be carried forward as provided in subdivision (d).

(C) For purposes of Section 172(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code,
 relating to amount of carrybacks and carryovers, the amount described in clause (ii) of subparagraph (B) shall be absorbed before the amount described in clause (i) of subparagraph (B).
